Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.090

Bond for injunction after temporary restraining order.

When an injunction is granted upon the hearing, after a temporary restraining order, the plaintiff shall not be required to enter into a second bond, unless the former shall be deemed insufficient, but the plaintiff and his or her surety shall remain liable upon his or her original bond.

[ 2011 c 336 s 195; Code 1881 s 160; 1877 p 33 s 160; 1869 p 39 s 158; 1854 p 153 s 118; RRS s 726.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 65(c).